dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
REP we Wë
REP rkli erkle
REP eigli éigle
REP s l
REP f e
REP eind éint
REP nbel bela
REP ci ic
REP se Së
REP it ti
REP o er
REP t f
REP Contac Kontak
REP e ëm
REP f p
REP asbl ASBL
REP schne chnes
REP ein éi
REP is si
REP f dw
REP oc Ok
REP betrie Betri
REP u us
REP édé ede
REP schre Schrë
REP A E
REP rgends ergend
REP éte eté
REP u w
REP rd art
REP I J
REP ve wé
REP eite éit
REP gn ng
REP ngesa ges
REP a r
REP ah ha
REP a lä
REP j h
REP erwie werwi
REP sé Se
REP ri iw
REP ofgela fgel
REP E Ën
REP sn ns

MAP 2
MAP CK
MAP ck



SFX b0 Y 5
SFX b0 0 st/a0 [^rs] is:superlative
SFX b0 0 t/a0 s is:superlative
SFX b0 0 st/a0 [^äu]r is:superlative
SFX b0 r erst/a0 [äu]r is:superlative
SFX b0 0 stent [^rs] is:superlative

SFX a0 N 12
SFX a0 0 em . is:em
SFX a0 0 en . is:en
SFX a0 0 e . is:en is:eifeler
SFX a0 0 er . is:er
SFX a0 n 0 [^rny]n is:eifeler
SFX a0 nn 0 [^aëio]nn is:eifeler is:eifeler_nn
SFX a0 0 t [^drt] is:t
SFX a0 0 t [^äu]r is:t
SFX a0 r ert [äu]r is:t
SFX a0 abel aablen abel
SFX a0 abel aablem abel
SFX a0 abel aabler abel

SFX a1 Y 33
SFX a1 0 em . is:em
SFX a1 0 en . is:en
SFX a1 0 e . is:en is:eifeler
SFX a1 0 er . is:er
SFX a1 f aft af is:t
SFX a1 g agt ag is:t
SFX a1 l alt al is:t
SFX a1 m amt am is:t
SFX a1 n ant an is:t
SFX a1 r art ar is:t
SFX a1 v avt av is:t
SFX a1 n änt än is:t
SFX a1 m emt em is:t
SFX a1 n ent en is:t
SFX a1 f ift if is:t
SFX a1 m imt im is:t
SFX a1 n int in is:t
SFX a1 s ist is is:t
SFX a1 v ivt iv is:t
SFX a1 b obt ob is:t
SFX a1 f oft of is:t
SFX a1 g ogt og is:t
SFX a1 m omt om is:t
SFX a1 n ont on is:t
SFX a1 n önt ön is:t
SFX a1 s ost os is:t
SFX a1 s öst ös is:t
SFX a1 l ult ul is:t
SFX a1 n unt un is:t
SFX a1 s ust us is:t
SFX a1 p opt op is:t
SFX a1 r ort or is:t
SFX a1 g ugt ug is:t

SFX b1 Y 37
SFX b1 0 ast/a0 a is:superlative
SFX b1 d adst/a0 ad is:superlative
SFX b1 f afst/a0 af is:superlative
SFX b1 g agst/a0 ag is:superlative
SFX b1 l alst/a0 al is:superlative
SFX b1 m amst/a0 am is:superlative
SFX b1 n anst/a0 an is:superlative
SFX b1 r arst/a0 ar is:superlative
SFX b1 t atst/a0 at is:superlative
SFX b1 v avst/a0 av is:superlative
SFX b1 n änst/a0 än is:superlative
SFX b1 m emst/a0 em is:superlative
SFX b1 n enst/a0 en is:superlative
SFX b1 d idst/a0 id is:superlative
SFX b1 f ifst/a0 if is:superlative
SFX b1 m imst/a0 im is:superlative
SFX b1 n inst/a0 in is:superlative
SFX b1 s ist/a0 is is:superlative
SFX b1 v ivst/a0 iv is:superlative
SFX b1 0 ost/a0 o is:superlative
SFX b1 d odst/a0 od is:superlative
SFX b1 d ödst/a0 öd is:superlative
SFX b1 f ofst/a0 of is:superlative
SFX b1 g ogst/a0 og is:superlative
SFX b1 n onst/a0 on is:superlative
SFX b1 n önst/a0 ön is:superlative
SFX b1 m omst/a0 om is:superlative
SFX b1 s ost/a0 os is:superlative
SFX b1 s öst/a0 ös is:superlative
SFX b1 t otst/a0 ot is:superlative
SFX b1 0 öst/a0 ö is:superlative
SFX b1 0 ust/a0 u is:superlative
SFX b1 d üdst/a0 üd is:superlative
SFX b1 s ust/a0 us is:superlative
SFX b1 t utst/a0 ut is:superlative
SFX b1 n unst/a0 un is:superlative
SFX b1 g ugst/a0 ug is:superlative

SFX a2 Y 46
SFX a2 0 ke c is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 ken c is:en
SFX a2 0 kem c is:em
SFX a2 0 ker c is:er
SFX a2 0 le l is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 len l is:en
SFX a2 0 lem l is:em
SFX a2 0 ler l is:er
SFX a2 0 me m is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 men m is:en
SFX a2 0 mem m is:em
SFX a2 0 mer m is:er
SFX a2 0 se s is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 sen s is:en
SFX a2 0 sem s is:em
SFX a2 0 ser s is:er
SFX a2 0 te t is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 ten t is:en
SFX a2 0 tem t is:em
SFX a2 0 ter t is:er
SFX a2 0 t [^et] is:t
SFX a2 e len le is:en
SFX a2 e lem le is:em
SFX a2 e ler le is:er
SFX a2 e le le is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 pen p is:en
SFX a2 0 pe p is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 pem p is:em
SFX a2 0 per p is:er
SFX a2 k cken k is:en
SFX a2 k cke k is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 k cker k is:er
SFX a2 k ckem k is:em
SFX a2 e men me is:en
SFX a2 e me me is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 e mer me is:er
SFX a2 e mem me is:em
SFX a2 e te te is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 e ten te is:en
SFX a2 e tem te is:em
SFX a2 e ter te is:er
SFX a2 0 t [^t]e is:t
SFX a2 0 nen n is:en
SFX a2 0 ne n is:en is:eifeler
SFX a2 0 nem n is:em
SFX a2 0 ner n is:er

SFX a4 Y 39
SFX a4 ef we ef is:en is:eifeler
SFX a4 ef wen ef is:en
SFX a4 ef wem ef is:em
SFX a4 ef wer ef is:er
SFX a4 f we [^e]f is:en is:eifeler
SFX a4 f wen [^e]f is:en
SFX a4 f wem [^e]f is:em
SFX a4 f wer [^e]f is:er
SFX a4 t de [^t]t is:en is:eifeler
SFX a4 t den [^t]t is:en
SFX a4 t dem [^t]t is:em
SFX a4 t der [^t]t is:er
SFX a4 tt dde tt is:en is:eifeler
SFX a4 tt dden tt is:en
SFX a4 tt ddem tt is:em
SFX a4 tt dder tt is:er
SFX a4 ch je ch is:en is:eifeler
SFX a4 ch jen ch is:en
SFX a4 ch jem ch is:em
SFX a4 ch jer ch is:er
SFX a4 er re er is:en is:eifeler
SFX a4 er ren er is:en
SFX a4 er rem er is:em
SFX a4 er rer er is:er
SFX a4 dd tte dd is:en is:eifeler
SFX a4 dd tten dd is:en
SFX a4 dd ttem dd is:em
SFX a4 dd tter dd is:er
SFX a4 0 t [^tdi] is:t
SFX a4 0 ssen i is:en
SFX a4 0 sser i is:er
SFX a4 0 sse i is:en is:eifeler
SFX a4 0 ssem i is:em
SFX a4 0 st i is:t
SFX a4 d nen nd is:en
SFX a4 d ne nd is:en is:eifeler
SFX a4 d nem nd is:em
SFX a4 d ner nd is:er
SFX a4 0 s i is:s

SFX b2 Y 14
SFX b2 aach ächst/a0 aach is:superlative
SFX b2 aark äerkst/a0 aark is:superlative
SFX b2 aarf äerfst/a0 aarf is:superlative
SFX b2 aart äertst/a0 aart is:superlative
SFX b2 al eelst/a0 al is:superlative
SFX b2 ank änkst/a0 ank is:superlative
SFX b2 ich chst/a0 ch is:superlative
SFX b2 dd ttst/a0 dd is:superlative
SFX b2 ouss éisst/a0 ouss is:superlative
SFX b2 aarm äermst/a0 aarm is:superlative
SFX b2 uerz ierzt/a0 uerz is:superlative
SFX b2 aang ängst/a0 aang is:superlative
SFX b2 onk éngst/a0 onk is:superlative
SFX b2 gutt bescht/a0 gutt is:superlative

SFX a3 N 9
SFX a3 0 n [^e]e is:en
SFX a3 0 r [^e]e is:er
SFX a3 0 m [^e]e is:em
SFX a3 0 t . is:t
SFX a3 e ë [^e]e is:en is:eifeler is:eifeler_changed_e
SFX a3 0 ë ee is:en is:eifeler
SFX a3 0 ëm ee is:em
SFX a3 0 ën ee is:en
SFX a3 0 ër ee is:er

SFX n0 Y 3
SFX n0 0 en . is:plural
SFX n0 0 e [^é] is:plural is:eifeler
SFX n0 0 ë é is:plural is:eifeler is:eifeler_changed_e

SFX n4 Y 2
SFX n4 e ë . is:plural is:eifeler is:eifeler_changed_e
SFX n4 0 n . is:plural

SFX u1 Y 21
SFX u1 ad ieder ad is:plural
SFX u1 äis eiser äis is:plural
SFX u1 as ieser as is:plural
SFX u1 at ieder at is:plural
SFX u1 d ner and is:plural
SFX u1 f wer [ueé][ei]f is:plural
SFX u1 d ter [ëe][ln]d is:plural
SFX u1 t der et is:plural
SFX u1 d ler ild is:plural
SFX u1 tt dder itt is:plural
SFX u1 uch icher uch is:plural
SFX u1 uerf ierfer uerf is:plural
SFX u1 uert ierder uert is:plural
SFX u1 um emer um is:plural
SFX u1 us iser us is:plural
SFX u1 llef alwer llef is:plural
SFX u1 af iewer af is:plural
SFX u1 ol eeler ol is:plural
SFX u1 ut ider ut is:plural
SFX u1 utt idder utt is:plural
SFX u1 ued ieder ued is:plural

SFX l0 Y 18
SFX l0 aaft äften/c0 aaft is:plural
SFX l0 d ten/c0 [^d]d is:plural
SFX l0 dd tten/c0 dd is:plural
SFX l0 f wen/c0 [^e]f is:plural
SFX l0 isch jen/c0 isch is:plural
SFX l0 er ren/c0 oer is:plural
SFX l0 uucht iichten/c0 uucht is:plural
SFX l0 leg gen/c0 leg is:plural
SFX l0 ar ären/c0 ar is:plural
SFX l0 ch jen/c0 rch is:plural
SFX l0 t den/c0 [ei]t is:plural
SFX l0 tt dden/c0 tt is:plural
SFX l0 i en/c0 i is:plural
SFX l0 b pen/c0 b is:plural
SFX l0 f wen/c0 [^l]ef is:plural
SFX l0 ef wen/c0 lef is:plural
SFX l0 angscht ängschten/c0 angscht is:plural
SFX l0 Angscht Ängschten/c0 Angscht is:plural
